Washington statutes.
RCW 36.74.020

Ordinance or resolution of intention to assume rights, powers, functions, and obligations—Adoption—Publication—Hearing.

(1) The assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of a transportation benefit district may be initiated by the adoption of an ordinance or a resolution by the city or county legislative authority indicating its intention to conduct a hearing concerning the assumption of such rights, powers, functions, and obligations. If the city or county legislative authority adopts such an ordinance or a resolution of intention, the ordinance or resolution must set a time and place at which the city or county legislative authority will consider the proposed assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district, and must state that all persons interested may appear and be heard. The ordinance or resolution of intention must be published at least two times during the two weeks preceding the scheduled hearing in newspapers of daily general circulation printed or published in the city or county in which the transportation benefit district is to be located.

(2) At the time scheduled for the hearing in the ordinance or resolution of intention, the city or county legislative authority must consider the assumption of the rights, powers, functions, and obligations of the transportation benefit district and hear those appearing and all protests and objections to it. The city or county legislative authority may continue the hearing from time to time, not exceeding sixty days in all.

[ 2015 3rd sp.s. c 44 s 302.]

NOTES:

Effective date—2015 3rd sp.s. c 44: See note following RCW 46.68.395.